Alabama, session 2026rs, HB158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 13A-12-113, 13A-12-121, and
13A-12-122, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
follows:
"§13A-12-113
(a) A person commits the crime of promoting
prostitution in the third degree if he or she knowingly
advances or profits from prostitution.
(b) Promoting prostitution in the third degree is a
Class A misdemeanor Class D felony."
"§13A-12-121
(a) No person shall commit an act of prostitution as
defined in Section 13A-12-120.
(b)(1) No person shall solicit, compel, or coerce any
person to have sexual intercourse or participate in any
natural or unnatural sexual act, sodomy, or sexual contact for
monetary consideration or other thing of marketable value.
(2) A person who violates this subsection shall be
punished as follows:
a. On a first violation, the person shall be guilty of
a Class A misdemeanor.
b. On a second violation, the person shall be guilty of
a Class A misdemeanor and shall be sentenced to serve not less
than five days in the county jail.
Page 2

than five days in the county jail.
HB158 INTRODUCED
c. On a third or subsequent violation, the person shall
be guilty of a Class D felony and shall be sentenced to serve
not less than 30 days in the county jail.
(3)a. If the person solicited, compelled, or coerced a
trafficking victim, as defined under Section 13A-6-151, to
engage in sexual intercourse, a sexual act, sodomy, or sexual
contact, the person shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
b. It is not a defense to prosecution under this
subdivision that the defendant did not know the victim was a
trafficking victim.
(c) No person shall agree to engage in sexual
intercourse, sodomy, or sexual contact with another or
participate in the act for monetary consideration or other
thing of marketable value and give or accept monetary
consideration or other thing of value in furtherance of the
agreement.
(d) No person shall knowingly do any of the following:
(1) Cause or aid a person to commit or engage in
prostitution.
(2) Procure or solicit patrons for prostitution.
(3) Provide persons or premises for prostitution
purposes.
(4) Receive or accept money or other thing of value
pursuant to a prior agreement with any person whereby he or
she participates or is to participate in the proceeds of any
prostitution activity.
(5) Operate or assist in the operation of a house of
prostitution or a prostitution enterprise."
Page 3

prostitution or a prostitution enterprise."
HB158 INTRODUCED
"§13A-12-122
(a) Each Except as otherwise provided in Section
13A-12-121(b), each violation of Section 13A-12-121 is a Class
A misdemeanor.
(b) A violation of Section 13A-12-121.1 is a Class B
felony."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4